Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.193

Firearms—Length of confinement.

(1) If a respondent is found to have been in possession of a firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(v), the court shall impose a minimum disposition of ten days of confinement. If the offender's standard range of disposition for the offense as indicated in RCW 13.40.0357 is more than thirty days of confinement, the court shall commit the offender to the department for the standard range disposition. The offender shall not be released until the offender has served a minimum of ten days in confinement.

(2)(a) If a respondent is found to have been in possession of a firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.040, the disposition must include a requirement that the respondent participate in a qualifying program as described in (b) of this subsection, when available, unless the court makes a written finding based on the outcome of the juvenile court risk assessment that participation in a qualifying program would not be appropriate.

(b) For purposes of this section, "qualifying program" means an aggression replacement training program, a functional family therapy program, or another program applicable to the juvenile firearm offender population that has been identified as evidence-based or research-based and cost-beneficial in the current list prepared at the direction of the legislature by the Washington state institute for public policy.

(3) If the court finds that the respondent or an accomplice was armed with a firearm, the court shall determine the standard range disposition for the offense pursuant to RCW 13.40.160. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm when the offender committed any felony other than possession of a machine gun or bump-fire stock, possession of a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, or use of a machine gun or bump-fire stock in a felony, the following periods of total confinement must be added to the sentence: (a) Except for (b) of this subsection, for a class A felony, six months; for a class B felony, four months; and for a class C felony, two months; (b) for any violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, committed by a respondent who is sixteen or seventeen years old at the time of the offense, a period of twelve months. The additional time shall be imposed regardless of the offense's juvenile disposition offense category as designated in RCW 13.40.0357.

(4)(a) If the court finds that the respondent who is sixteen or seventeen years old and committed the offense of robbery in the first degree, drive-by shooting, rape of a child in the first degree, burglary in the first degree, or any violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 and was armed with a firearm, and the court finds that the respondent's participation was related to membership in a criminal street gang or advancing the benefit, aggrandizement, gain, profit, or other advantage for a criminal street gang, a period of three months total confinement must be added to the sentence. The additional time must be imposed regardless of the offense's juvenile disposition offense category as designated in RCW 13.40.0357 and must be served consecutively with any other sentencing enhancement.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "criminal street gang" means any ongoing organization, association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or informal, having a common name or common identifying sign or symbol, having as one of its primary activities the commission of criminal acts, and whose members or associates individually or collectively engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal street gang activity. This definition does not apply to employees engaged in concerted activities for their mutual aid and protection, or to the activities of labor and bona fide nonprofit organizations or their members or agents.

(5) When a disposition under this section would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court may impose another disposition. When a judge finds a manifest injustice and imposes a disposition of confinement exceeding thirty days, the court shall commit the juvenile to a maximum term, and the provisions of RCW 13.40.030(2) shall be used to determine the range. When a judge finds a manifest injustice and imposes a disposition of confinement less than thirty days, the disposition shall be comprised of confinement or community supervision or both.

(6) Any term of confinement ordered pursuant to this section shall run consecutively to any term of confinement imposed in the same disposition for other offenses.

[ 2023 c 295 s 10; 2022 c 268 s 39; 2020 c 18 s 10; 2019 c 64 s 4. Prior: 2018 c 162 s 5; 2018 c 22 s 7; 2018 c 7 s 9; 2014 c 117 s 1; 2003 c 53 s 100; 1997 c 338 s 30; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 525.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 295: See note following RCW 9.41.040.

Effective dates—2022 c 268: See note following RCW 7.105.010.

Explanatory statement—2020 c 18: See note following RCW 43.79A.040.

Explanatory statement—2019 c 64: See note following RCW 1.20.110.

Report to legislature—2019 c 322 ss 2-6; 2018 c 162: See RCW 13.04.800.

Explanatory statement—2018 c 22: See note following RCW 1.20.051.

Effective dates—2018 c 7: See note following RCW 9.41.010.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Finding—Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338: See note following RCW 13.40.0357.

Severability—Effective dates—1997 c 338: See notes following RCW 5.60.060.

Finding—Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Contingent expiration date—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.